Utah statutes.
75-7-803.   Impartiality.

If a trust has two or more beneficiaries, the trustee shall act impartially in investing, managing, and distributing the trust property, giving due regard to the beneficiaries' respective interests.



Enacted by Chapter 89, 2004 General Session

